District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

5-133.04

Watchmen at Municipal Building.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1909, 35 Stat. 689, ch. 250
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3103, 51 DCR 8441

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-112.
1973 Ed., § 4-111.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3103, 3104 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3103, 3104 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of subtitle A of title III of D.C. Law 15-205: Section 3104 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided: “This subtitle shall apply as of the implementation date for transferring the Protective Services Division, and the functions performed by the Protective Services Division, from the Office of Property Management to the Metropolitan Police Department specified in a reorganization plan submitted by the Mayor to the Council pursuant to the Governmental Reorganization Procedures Act of 1981, effective October 17, 1981 (D.C. Law 4-42; D.C. Official Code § 1-315.01 et seq.), that has been approved by the Council.”